chrome/third_party/hunspell/dictionaries/ca_ES.dic
abandonem/C
abastir/CY
ablamau/C
aboqueu/C
abreviau/C
abrusar/CY
abusar/CY
acanalau/C
acarcanyem/C
acatxin/C
acidem/C
aclimatar/CY
acolorant/C
aconductant/C
acoreu/C
acrediteu/C
acuitant/C
addicionant/C
adiu/CZ
adoctrineu/C
adormim/C
adveniu/CZ
afal·lerin/C
afegeixin/C
afetgegueu/C
afirmem/C
afogant/C
afrontau/C
agarbonant/C
agermaneu/C
agonitzar/CY
agrejar/CY
aguantem/C
aidar/CY
aixequin/C
ajustant/C
albirem/C
alertau/C
allargar/CY
allibereu/C
almescau/C
alullant/C
alçurant/C
amansir/CY
amarresquin/C
amenitzeu/C
amoixeu/C
amorrallau/C
amotinin/C
amuntoneu/C
andanin/C
anguniejar/CY
anomenant/C
anteposeu/C
apallem/C
apareixeu/C
apassionar/CY
aperduau/C
apirrossant/C
apletant/C
aponentem/C
apostrofar/CY
aprofitem/C
apuntalant/C
aquintaneu/C
arenin/C
aromatitzant/CEVY
arraconeu/C
arrasau/C
arregussin/C
arrepapeu/C
arrodolem/C
arrosseguem/C
articulau/C
aspectuant/C
assageteu/C
assegurin/C
assetgeu/C
astorant/C
atenguem/C
atorrollar/CY
até/CZ
avarieu/C
avorreixin/C
balbar/C
banquetejant/C
barrinau/C
batin/C
bergantegeu/C
biparteixin/C
bloquegem/C
bonificar/C
borrufegeu/C
brandeu/C
brollar/CE
brunyim/C
burlin/C
caciquegin/C
calcau/C
camatrenquin/C
cantussegin/C
capicular/C
captrenqueu/C
caricaturin/C
cassau/C
cavalquem/C
cerqueu/C
circumdau/C
classifiquin/C
coadjuvau/C
cohibeixin/C
coltellejant/C
combregar/CE
comparteixin/C
comploteu/C
concerneix/C
condormin/C
confugint/C
conjurem/C
consolant/C
contemplant/C
contrafirmar/C
contrariegeu/C
convoquem/C
cordejar/C
corroborant/CE
craneu/C
crispau/C
cuinejant/C
dallem/C
decalvin/C
decurvem/C
degotau/C
delirar/C
denudar/C
derramau/C
desacordem/C
desagreguem/C
desamurant/C
desareneu/C
desarrimant/C
desavenint/C
desboteu/C
descanviant/C
descentralitzau/C
descomparteix/C
descontentem/C
descrosterin/C
desedifiquem/C
desembarrin/C
desembotornem/C
desemmatant/C
desempaquetin/C
desempilin/C
desenastin/C
desencarcerin/C
desencimbellau/C
desencreueu/C
desenfebrau/C
desengandulir/C
desenjovar/C
desenquadrem/C
desensenyoreixin/C
desenterrin/C
desenvernissem/C
desestimeu/C
desfoguem/C
desgolfem/C
deshonorant/CE
desinteressar/C
deslluesquin/C
desmesclau/C
desnaturin/C
desorbiteu/C
desparençau/C
desplomin/C
desrosin/C
destapem/C
destrant/C
desveem/C
detestem/C
dictau/C
diluviau/C
discrepau/C
dissenyeu/C
diversifiqueu/C
domtar/C
duent/C
eixamenem/C
eixordeu/C
emancipar/CY
embalçar/CY
embarzerant/C
emboeteu/C
emborsau/C
embridin/C
emfasitzin/C
emmarcau/C
emmordassau/C
empallissem/C
empassau/C
empellant/C
empinant/C
empolsegar/CY
empremtin/C
enarborau/C
encaironau/C
encanonar/CY
encarbonin/C
encatifeu/C
encertar/CY
encobeir/CY
encontrau/C
encroquin/C
endevinin/C
endurim/C
enfellonim/C
enfolleixin/C
enfredoliqueu/C
engalipar/CY
engarlandeu/C
engolfant/C
engresqueu/C
enherbant/C
enllardonau/C
enlluenteix/C
enquimereu/C
enredin/C
enrogallin/C
ensaliveu/C
ensivellant/C
ensutzant/C
entendresquin/C
entornem/C
entrecanvieu/C
entremetent/CR
entretzenant/C
enumereu/C
envernisseu/C
envitricollin/C
equivocar/CY
esbalaeix/C
esbellussar/CY
esborrin/C
esbrotonau/C
escalant/C
escanyau/C
escarneixin/C
escateu/C
escocelleu/C
escorniflant/C
escrostonar/CY
esdentant/C
esgaldinyin/C
esgrafiem/C
esllanguiu/C
esmitgeu/C
espair/CY
espaventin/C
espellusseu/C
espicassant/C
espitgeu/C
esponjar/CY
esqueixalar/CY
esquitxant/C
estant/CEVY
estesar/CY
estontolin/C
estrenar/CY
estufornant/C
eteritzem/C
exaudiu/C
exemptau/C
expectorant/CEVY
exsecallau/C
extrudint/C
familiaritzau/C
favorejar/C
ferregeu/C
filustrem/C
flairant/CE
flocar/C
fomentin/C
formigonar/C
fotogravar/C
freturar/C
fumejar/C
galantegem/C
gangrenau/C
garolau/C
gaudint/C
giravoltar/C
gomboldau/C
graponant/C
grinyolau/C
guerxem/C
habituant/C
higienitzem/C
humectar/CY
immobilitzeu/C
impossibilitem/C
incitau/C
indicau/C
infibuleu/C
inhumin/C
inspeccionem/C
intercanviant/C
intimidem/C
involucrem/C
jaguem/C
juxtaposant/C
levitar/C
llagrimegin/C
llaunem/C
llibertar/C
lluentegeu/C
madurem/C
maleficiem/C
malprenent/CR
manifassegin/C
maquinau/C
martellejant/CE
maurin/C
menstruau/C
mesturant/C
militaritzant/C
mitifiquin/C
moltureu/C
mortasar/C
municionar/C
naixent/CE
negueu/C
noent/CR
nyaufem/C
obstruint/C
oficiant/CEVY
opsonitzem/C
ormejau/C
paccioneu/C
palpinyar/C
parapetau/C
partionau/C
pavonant/C
penedeix/C
perdurar/C
pernejar/C
perverteixin/C
picarolejar/C
pipin/C
plantant/C
ploriquejant/C
polititzant/C
porfiritzant/C
potollant/C
prefereixin/C
prepareu/C
pretén/CS
prodigau/C
pronominalitzant/C
prosternem/C
puniu/C
quarterem/C
racionalitzem/C
ranejant/C
rasureu/C
realitzem/C
rebolcau/C
recalçant/C
recloguem/C
reconduir/C
recruem/C
redueix/C
reestructurin/C
refonamentin/C
regategeu/C
reguardejant/C
reinvertiu/C
relluqueu/C
remordeix/C
renyin/C
repensar/C
reposeu/C
requeu/C
responsabilitzeu/C
ressorgir/C
retenyiu/C
retrogradar/C
revelliu/C
reviseu/C
ritmant/C
rompent/CER
roteu/C
sabotejant/C
saliquem/C
sancionem/C
seccioneu/C
semblar/C
serveu/C
sincerem/C
sobreargentau/C
sobrenéixer/C
socalivar/C
solfejant/C
sondegin/C
sostinguin/C
subdivideix/C
substantivant/C
sulfurar/C
susciteu/C
tamborinegem/C
tastem/C
tempirant/C
termenin/C
timbrin/C
tombassegeu/C
torrau/C
trafiquem/C
transfigurau/C
tranuitant/C
traumatitzar/C
trepollau/C
tripliquem/C
trullau/C
ulcerin/C
urgim/C
validin/C
velejar/C
verguegem/C
vibrem/C
visionar/C
voregin/C
xapau/C
xerriquem/C
xorrencar/C
